Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.733

Requirement to utilize print management contracts—Exemptions.

(1) The department shall broker print management contracts for state agencies that are required to utilize print management contracts under this section.

(2) The department is authorized to broker print management contracts for other state agencies that choose to utilize these services.

(3) Except as provided under subsection (6) of this section, all state agencies with total annual average full-time equivalent staff that exceeds one thousand as determined by the office of financial management shall utilize print management services brokered by the department, as follows:

(a) Any agency with a copier and multifunctional device contract that is set to expire on or before December 31, 2011, may opt to:

(i) Renew the copier and multifunctional device contract; or

(ii) Enter a print management contract;

(b) Any agency with a copier and multifunctional device contract that is set to expire on or after January 1, 2012, shall begin planning for the transition to a print management contract six months prior to the expiration date of the contract. Upon expiration of the copier and multifunctional device contract, the agency shall utilize a print management contract; and

(c) Any agency with a copier and multifunctional device contract that is terminated on or after January 1, 2012, shall enter a print management contract.

(4) Until December 31, 2016, for each agency transitioning from a copier and multifunctional device contract to a print management contract, the print management contract should result in savings in comparison with the prior copier and multifunctional device contract.

(5) If an agency has more full-time equivalent employees than it had when it entered its most recently completed print management contract, the cost of a new print management contract may exceed the cost of the most recently completed print management contract.

(6) The director of financial management may exempt a state agency, or a program within a state agency, from the requirements of this section if the director deems it unfeasible or the department and agency could not reasonably reach an agreement regarding print management.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 308.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.